Utah statutes.
58-57-10.   Use of title or designation.

(1)  Only a respiratory care practitioner may use the following titles or designations in this state:

(a)  respiratory care practitioner;

(b)  respiratory therapist; or

(c)  respiratory technician.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 106, 2006 General Session

